Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 05. Alaska Marriage Code.

Cross references. —

For provisions related to community property, see AS 34.77.

Collateral references. —

41 Am. Jur. 2d, Husband and Wife, § 1 et seq.

52 Am. Jur. 2d, Marriage, § 1 et seq.

41 C.J.S., Husband & Wife, § 1 et seq.

55 C.J.S., Marriage, § 1, et seq.